Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1075
Act; activities exempt.

The Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act does not apply to or restrict the activities of the following:

(1) Any person holding a current license or certificate issued pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act when engaged in the usual and customary practice of his or her profession or occupation;

(2) Any person engaging solely in earlobe piercing;

(3) Any person engaging solely in natural hair braiding;

(4) Any person when engaged in domestic or charitable administration;

(5) Any person performing any of the practices of cosmetology or nail technology solely for theatrical presentations or other entertainment functions;

(6) Any person practicing cosmetology, electrology, esthetics, or nail technology within the confines of a hospital, nursing home, massage therapy establishment, funeral establishment, or other similar establishment or facility licensed or otherwise regulated by the department, except that no unlicensed person may accept compensation for such practice;

(7) Any person providing services during a bona fide emergency;

(8) Any retail or wholesale establishment or any person engaged in the sale of cosmetics, nail technology products, or other beauty products when the products are applied by the customer or when the application of the products is in direct connection with the sale or attempted sale of such products at retail;

(9) Any person when engaged in nonvocational training;

(10) A person demonstrating on behalf of a manufacturer or distributor any cosmetology, nail technology, electrolysis, or body art equipment or supplies if such demonstration is performed without charge;

(11) Any person or licensee engaged in the practice or teaching of manicuring;

(12) Any person or licensee engaged in the practice of airbrush tanning or temporary, nonpermanent airbrush tattooing; and

(13) Any person applying cosmetics.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 67;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 14;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 97;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 33;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 44;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 16;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 28;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 33;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,106;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 337;

Laws 2016, LB898, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 24.